fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-II-mihkwaw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - mihkwâw - help : # Wolvengrey VIIv:


     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+3Sg:  mihkwâw
     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+3Pl:  mihkwâwa
     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+4Sg:  mihkwâniw
     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+4Pl:  mihkwâniwa
     
     PV/ê+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: ê-mihkwâk
     PV/ê+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: ê-mihkwâki
     PV/ê+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: ê-mihkwânik
     PV/ê+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: ê-mihkwâniki
     
     mihkwâw+V+II+Cond+3Sg:  mihkwâki
     mihkwâw+V+II+Cond+3Pl:  mihkwâkwâwi
     mihkwâw+V+II+Cond+4Sg:  mihkwâniki
     mihkwâw+V+II+Cond+4Pl:  mihkwânikwâwi
